Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.030

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Farm" means the same as "farm" in 21 C.F.R. Sec. 112.

(2) "Produce" means the same as "produce" in 21 C.F.R. Sec. 112.

(3) "Produce safety rule" means the standards for the growing, harvesting, packing, and holding of produce for human consumption adopted by the United States food and drug administration as a final rule on November 27, 2015 (80 Federal Register 74353 et seq.) and codified in 21 C.F.R. Parts 11, 16, and 112.

[ 2018 c 106 s 3.]